Hawaii statutes.
[§236E-13] Amended returns; final
determination. If the amount of the federal taxable estate reported on an
estate's federal estate tax return is changed or corrected by the Internal
Revenue Service, the person required to make and file the estate tax return
under this chapter shall provide notice of the change or correction to the
department by filing, within ninety days after the final determination of the
change or correction, or as otherwise required by the department, an amended
return under this chapter, and shall furnish to the department any information,
schedules, records, documents or papers relating to the change or correction.
The time for filing the return may be extended by the department upon a showing
of due cause. If an additional tax under this chapter is required to be paid
pursuant to the changed or amended return, the person required to pay the tax
shall pay the additional tax, together with interest as provided in section
236E-10, at the same time the supplemental or amended return is filed. [L 2012,
c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next